Vermont, session 2025-2026, H118.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 1455 is amended to read:
§ 1455. HATE-MOTIVATED CRIMES
(a) A person who commits, causes to be committed, or attempts to commit
any crime and whose conduct is motivated, in whole or in part, by the victim’s
another person’s or a group of persons’ actual or perceived membership in a
protected category shall be subject to the following penalties:
(1) If the maximum penalty for the underlying crime is one year or less,
the penalty for a violation of this section shall be imprisonment for not more
than two years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(2) If the maximum penalty for the underlying crime is more than one
year but less than five years, the penalty for a violation of this section shall be
imprisonment for not more than five years or a fine of not more than
$10,000.00, or both.
(3) If the maximum penalty for the underlying crime is five years or
more, the penalty for the underlying crime shall apply; however, the court shall
consider the motivation of the defendant as a factor in sentencing.
(b) The victim’s A person’s or a group of persons’ actual or perceived
membership in a protected category or categories need not be the predominant
reason or the sole reason for the defendant’s conduct.
VT LEG #383323 v.1

No. 8 Page 2 of 2
2025
(c) As used in this section, “protected category” includes race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, age, service in the U.S. Armed Forces
or the National Guard, disability as defined by 21 V.S.A. § 495d(5), sexual
orientation, gender identity, and perceived membership in any such group.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: April 29, 2025
VT LEG #383323 v.1